dictsource/scn_rules
// Sicilian translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// Preliminary support using the Italian phoneme table as a base.

// A  any vowel
// C  any consonant
// K  not a vowel
// Y  front vowels: e i and accented variants

.L01 a e i o u à á â è é ê ì í î ò ó ô ù ú û
.L02 b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v x z ç ḍ ḥ ṅ ṛ ṭ

// Syntactic gemination (dubbramentu).  These cross-word contexts match
// exact trigger words while preserving the word boundary and stress domain.

.group '
        'n (_S2    n

.group a
        a          a
        ai         aI
        au         aU

.group à
        à          'a

.group á
        á          'a

.group â
        â          a:

.group b
        _e_) b       b:
        _è_) b       b:
        _a_) b       b:
        _ma_) b      b:
        _di_) b      b:
        _pi_) b      b:
        _chi_) b     b:
        b          b
        bb         b:

.group c
        _e_) ci (L01  tS:
        _è_) ci (L01  tS:
        _a_) ci (L01  tS:
        _ma_) ci (L01 tS:
        _di_) ci (L01 tS:
        _pi_) ci (L01 tS:
        _chi_) ci (L01 tS:
        _e_) c (Y    tS:
        _è_) c (Y    tS:
        _a_) c (Y    tS:
        _ma_) c (Y   tS:
        _di_) c (Y   tS:
        _pi_) c (Y   tS:
        _chi_) c (Y  tS:
        _e_) c       k:
        _è_) c       k:
        _a_) c       k:
        _ma_) c      k:
        _di_) c      k:
        _pi_) c      k:
        _chi_) c     k:
        c          k
        cc         k:
        chi (L01   c
        cchi (L01  c0c
        ch (Y      c
        cch (Y     c0c
        ci (L01    C
        cci (L01   tS;
        n) c (Y    tS
        r) c (Y    tS
        c (Y       S
        cc (Y      tS:

.group ç
        ç          C

.group d
        _e_) d       d:
        _è_) d       d:
        _a_) d       d:
        _ma_) d      d:
        _di_) d      d:
        _pi_) d      d:
        _chi_) d     d:
        d          d
        dd         d.0d.     // Sicilian cacuminal/retroflex geminate: unreleased closure plus release.
        dr         d.r.
        L01) d (L01 *

.group ḍ
        ḍ          d.
        ḍḍ         d.0d.

.group e
        e          E

.group é
        é          'E

.group è
        è          'E

.group ê
        ê          E:

.group f
        _e_) f       f:
        _è_) f       f:
        _a_) f       f:
        _ma_) f      f:
        _di_) f      f:
        _pi_) f      f:
        _chi_) f     f:
        f          f
        ff         f:

.group g
        _e_) gi (L01  dZ:
        _è_) gi (L01  dZ:
        _a_) gi (L01  dZ:
        _ma_) gi (L01 dZ:
        _di_) gi (L01 dZ:
        _pi_) gi (L01 dZ:
        _chi_) gi (L01 dZ:
        _e_) g (Y    dZ:
        _è_) g (Y    dZ:
        _a_) g (Y    dZ:
        _ma_) g (Y   dZ:
        _di_) g (Y   dZ:
        _pi_) g (Y   dZ:
        _chi_) g (Y  dZ:
        _e_) g       g:
        _è_) g       g:
        _a_) g       g:
        _ma_) g      g:
        _di_) g      g:
        _pi_) g      g:
        _chi_) g     g:
        g          g
        gg         g:
        ghi (L01   J
        gghi (L01  J0J
        gh (Y      J
        ggh (Y     J0J
        gn         n^
        gli        l^
        gi (L01    dZ
        ggi (L01   dZ:
        g (Y       dZ
        gg (Y      dZ:
        gu (L01    gw

.group h
        h

.group ḥ
        ḥ          C

.group i
        i          i
        i (L01     j

.group ì
        ì          'i

.group í
        í          'i

.group î
        î          i:

.group j
        n_) j      J
        _tri_) j    J0J
        _e_) j       J0J
        _è_) j       J0J
        _a_) j       J0J
        _ma_) j      J0J
        _di_) j      J0J
        _pi_) j      J0J
        _chi_) j     J0J
        j          j

.group k
        k          k
        kk         k:

.group l
        _e_) l       l:
        _è_) l       l:
        _a_) l       l:
        _ma_) l      l:
        _di_) l      l:
        _pi_) l      l:
        _chi_) l     l:
        l          l
        ll         l:

.group m
        _e_) m       m:
        _è_) m       m:
        _a_) m       m:
        _ma_) m      m:
        _di_) m      m:
        _pi_) m      m:
        _chi_) m     m:
        m          m
        mm         m:

.group n
        _e_) n       n:
        _è_) n       n:
        _a_) n       n:
        _ma_) n      n:
        _di_) n      n:
        _pi_) n      n:
        _chi_) n     n:
        n          n
        nn         n:
        n (dr      n.
        n (tr      n.
        ng (L01    N:
        n (b       m
        n (p       m
        n (g       N
        n (k       N
        n (q       N

.group ṅ
        ṅ          N

.group o
        o          O
        oi         oI

.group ó
        ó          'O

.group ò
        ò          'O

.group ô
        ô          O:

.group p
        _e_) p       p:
        _è_) p       p:
        _a_) p       p:
        _ma_) p      p:
        _di_) p      p:
        _pi_) p      p:
        _chi_) p     p:
        p          p
        pp         p:

.group q
        _e_) q       k:
        _è_) q       k:
        _a_) q       k:
        _ma_) q      k:
        _di_) q      k:
        _pi_) q      k:
        _chi_) q     k:
        q          k
        qu (L01    kw

.group r
        _e_) r       R
        _è_) r       R
        _a_) r       R
        _ma_) r      R
        _di_) r      R
        _pi_) r      R
        _chi_) r     R
        r          *
        _) r (L01  R
        rr         R

.group ṛ
        ṛ          r.

.group s
        _e_) str     s.:r.
        _è_) str     s.:r.
        _a_) str     s.:r.
        _ma_) str    s.:r.
        _di_) str    s.:r.
        _pi_) str    s.:r.
        _chi_) str   s.:r.
        _e_) sci (L01 S:
        _è_) sci (L01 S:
        _a_) sci (L01 S:
        _ma_) sci (L01 S:
        _di_) sci (L01 S:
        _pi_) sci (L01 S:
        _chi_) sci (L01 S:
        _e_) sc (Y   S:
        _è_) sc (Y   S:
        _a_) sc (Y   S:
        _ma_) sc (Y  S:
        _di_) sc (Y  S:
        _pi_) sc (Y  S:
        _chi_) sc (Y S:
        _e_) s       ss
        _è_) s       ss
        _a_) s       ss
        _ma_) s      ss
        _di_) s      ss
        _pi_) s      ss
        _chi_) s     ss
        s          s
        ss         ss
        str        s.:r.
        sdr        z.:r.
        sci (L01   S:
        sc (Y      S:
        s (b       Z
        s (v       Z
        s (d       z
        s (g       z
        s (l       z
        s (m       z
        s (n       z
        s (r       z

.group t
        _e_) tr      t.r.
        _è_) tr      t.r.
        _a_) tr      t.r.
        _ma_) tr     t.r.
        _di_) tr     t.r.
        _pi_) tr     t.r.
        _chi_) tr    t.r.
        _e_) t       t:
        _è_) t       t:
        _a_) t       t:
        _ma_) t      t:
        _di_) t      t:
        _pi_) t      t:
        _chi_) t     t:
        t          t
        tt         t:
        tr         t.r.

.group ṭ
        ṭ          t.

.group u
        u          u
        u (L01     w

.group ù
        ù          'u

.group ú
        ú          'u

.group û
        û          u:

.group v
        _e_) v       v:
        _è_) v       v:
        _a_) v       v:
        _ma_) v      v:
        _di_) v      v:
        _pi_) v      v:
        _chi_) v     v:
        v          v
        vv         v:

.group x
        _e_) x       S:
        _è_) x       S:
        _a_) x       S:
        _ma_) x      S:
        _di_) x      S:
        _pi_) x      S:
        _chi_) x     S:
        x          S

.group z
        _e_) z       ts:
        _è_) z       ts:
        _a_) z       ts:
        _ma_) z      ts:
        _di_) z      ts:
        _pi_) z      ts:
        _chi_) z     ts:
        L01) zz    ts:
        n) zz      ts:
        zz         ts:
        L01) z     dz
        n) z       dz
        z          ts
